Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 9 Petitions to General Assembly

22-9-1.
Notice to parties adversely affected by petitions.

Whenever any petition presented to either house of the general assembly shall affect the right or interest of any person other than the petitioner, the petition shall be continued to the time as may be ordered by the house in which it is presented, and notice of the pendency of the petition shall be ordered by that house to be served, at the expense of the petitioner, upon the person who shall be interested adversely to the petitioner in it, as by that house shall be deemed reasonable and proper; but if the petitioner shall have served the adverse party with a copy of the petition thirty (30) days before the commencement of the session of the general assembly at which the petition is presented, with a notice of his or her intention to present the petition, and it shall be made to appear to the general assembly that the notice was reasonable and proper, and was properly given, the petition may be considered whenever it is presented; but no petition affecting the interest of any city or town shall be proceeded with at the session at which it shall be presented, unless notice of the petition, in the manner set forth in this section, shall have been served upon the city or town council in open meeting sixty (60) days prior to the presentation of the petition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 21, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 27, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 26, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 303, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-9-1

.

22-9-2.
Notice of bill to create corporation with power of eminent domain.

Whenever any bill shall be presented to either house of the general assembly to create a corporation which shall be authorized to exercise the right to eminent domain, or which shall have the right to acquire franchises in the streets and highways of any city or town, notice of the pendency of the petition for the passage of the bill shall be given by the petitioners for it in some newspaper published in the city of Providence and also in some newspaper published in the city, town or county where the corporation is sought to be located (or, if there be no newspaper published in the city, town or county, then in some newspaper published in an adjoining city, town or county), for three (3) weeks successively after the presentation of the bill; and the notice shall specify the purpose of the corporation, the place where it is intended to be established, and the towns or cities where the right of eminent domain is to be exercised or the franchises are to be acquired.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 21, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 27, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 26, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 303, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

22-9-2

.